Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201916-675
Acquisition; operation; tax authorized.

The mayor and city council of a city of the first class may levy a tax, not exceeding seven cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such city, for the purpose of paying the cost of lighting the streets, lanes, alleys, and other public places or property of the city, for the purpose of furnishing water, heat, or power for the city, or for the purpose of buying, establishing, extending, or maintaining such waterworks, gas, electric, or other light works, or heating or power plant, not exceeding three and five-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such city for any one of the respective purposes.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 54, p. 272;

Laws 1905, c. 23, § 2, p. 244;

Laws 1907, c. 14, § 1, p. 122;

Laws 1909, c. 19, § 1, p. 184;

R.S.1913, § 4954;

Laws 1917, c. 97, § 1, p. 261;

Laws 1919, c. 38, § 1, p. 121;

Laws 1921, c. 169, § 1, p. 661;

C.S.1922, § 4123;

C.S.1929, § 16-652;

Laws 1931, c. 29, § 1, p. 118;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 16-652;

R.S.1943, § 16-675;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 8, p. 934;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 39;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 43;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 66.

Provision in prior act, limiting tax levy to five mills on a dollar valuation for purpose stated, repealed by implication, and reduced to one mill on a dollar valuation by reason of the amendment of the general revenue laws. Drew v. Mumford, 114 Neb. 100, 206 N.W. 159 (1925).